Utah statutes.
31A-8a-209.   Health discount program fraud.
For purposes of Chapter 31, Insurance Fraud Act, a health discount program
operator is an insurer as defined in Section 31A-31-102 and is subject to the
provisions of Chapter 31, Insurance Fraud Act.
